District of Columbia statutes.
7-2042

Cease and desist orders.

(a)

If, after investigation, the Mayor determines that a person has violated any provision of this subchapter or any rule issued pursuant to this subchapter, and the violation presents an imminent danger to the public, the Mayor may issue a written order directing the person to cease and desist from the violation.

(b)

Within 5 days of service of the cease and desist order, the person shall request an expedited hearing on the violation. If no request for a hearing is made within the 5-day period, the cease and desist order shall be final. Within 5 business days of a timely request for an expedited hearing, the Mayor shall conduct a hearing.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 13, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3632.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.